Ohio, session 136, SB407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The thirtieth day of January is designated as "Franklin D. Roosevelt Day" in recognition of President Franklin D. Roosevelt, who was born on that day in 1882.